Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1656.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; GEOTHERMAL ENERGY SYSTEM.new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 116C.779, subdivision 1, paragraph (j), $2,250,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the renewable development account established in Minnesota Statutes, section 116C.779, subdivision 1, to the commissioner of commerce for a grant to Como Zoo in the city of St. Paul to construct a geothermal energy system that provides space heating and cooling to the large cats building. new text end new text begin (b) For the purposes of this section, "geothermal energy system" means a system composed of a heat pump that moves a heat-transferring fluid through piping embedded in the earth and absorbs the earth's constant temperature, a heat exchanger, and ductwork to distribute heated and cooled air to a building. new text end